Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.488

Fire protection and safety in proposed annexed territory—Report request.

Upon the written request of a fire protection district, code cities annexing territory under this chapter shall, prior to completing the annexation, issue a report regarding the likely effects that the annexation and any associated asset transfers may have upon the safety of residents within and outside the proposed annexation area. The report must address, but is not limited to, the provisions of fire protection and emergency medical services within and outside of the proposed annexation area. A fire protection district may only request a report under this section when at least five percent of the assessed valuation of the fire protection district will be annexed.

[ 2009 c 60 s 11.]